Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3603
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Corn Resources Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 2-3604 to 2-3610 shall be used.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1336, § 2.